dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3702 N 1
SFX 3702 0 mizdeler .

SFX 3703 N 1
SFX 3703 0 sindekilerce .

SFX 3704 N 1
SFX 3704 0 muzdaydı .

SFX 3705 N 1
SFX 3705 0 sundakileri .

SFX 3706 N 1
SFX 3706 0 sundakilerin .

SFX 3707 N 1
SFX 3707 0 sundaydın .

SFX 3708 N 1
SFX 3708 0 müşçesine .

SFX 3709 N 1
SFX 3709 0 müşsen .

SFX 3710 N 1
SFX 3710 0 müştürler .

SFX 3711 N 1
SFX 3711 0 müşüzdür .

SFX 3712 N 1
SFX 3712 0 ürdün .

SFX 3713 N 1
SFX 3713 0 ürlermiş .

SFX 3714 N 1
SFX 3714 0 rsünüz .

SFX 3715 N 1
SFX 3715 0 yledir .

SFX 3716 N 1
SFX 3716 0 ndür .

SFX 3717 N 1
SFX 3717 0 ünündür .

SFX 3718 N 1
SFX 3718 0 nünmüş .

SFX 3719 N 1
SFX 3719 0 sünüzdür .

SFX 3720 N 1
SFX 3720 0 düydü .

SFX 3721 N 1
SFX 3721 0 düysem .

SFX 3722 N 1
SFX 3722 0 düysen .

SFX 3723 N 1
SFX 3723 0 düyseniz .

SFX 3724 N 1
SFX 3724 0 lerimizdiniz .

SFX 3725 N 1
SFX 3725 0 mizsiniz .

SFX 3726 N 1
SFX 3726 0 lerimizinki .

SFX 3727 N 1
SFX 3727 0 lerimleydi .

SFX 3728 N 1
SFX 3728 0 lerinizinkinden .

SFX 3729 N 1
SFX 3729 0 leriydim .

SFX 3730 N 1
SFX 3730 0 tekilerini .

SFX 3731 N 1
SFX 3731 0 müşler .

SFX 3732 N 1
SFX 3732 0 tekinin .

SFX 3733 N 1
SFX 3733 0 türler .

SFX 3734 N 1
SFX 3734 0 tüyse .

SFX 3735 N 1
SFX 3735 0 mesin .

SFX 3736 N 1
SFX 3736 0 meyim .

SFX 3737 N 1
SFX 3737 0 meyiz .

SFX 3738 N 1
SFX 3738 0 meymiş .

SFX 3739 N 1
SFX 3739 0 meyse .

SFX 3740 N 1
SFX 3740 0 msün .

SFX 3741 N 1
SFX 3741 0 müşsek .

SFX 3742 N 1
SFX 3742 0 müşsündür .

SFX 3743 N 1
SFX 3743 0 müştün .

SFX 3744 N 1
SFX 3744 0 müşümdür .

SFX 3745 N 1
SFX 3745 0 ndü .

SFX 3746 N 1
SFX 3746 0 nmüş .

SFX 3747 N 1
SFX 3747 0 nmüşse .

SFX 3748 N 1
SFX 3748 0 rdü .

SFX 3749 N 1
SFX 3749 0 rdük .

SFX 3750 N 1
SFX 3750 0 rdüm .

SFX 3751 N 1
SFX 3751 0 rmüş .

SFX 3752 N 1
SFX 3752 0 rsün .

SFX 3753 N 1
SFX 3753 0 rüm .

SFX 3754 N 1
SFX 3754 0 rüz .

SFX 3755 N 1
SFX 3755 0 sündeydi .

SFX 3756 N 1
SFX 3756 0 tüydü .

SFX 3757 N 1
SFX 3757 0 tüysek .

SFX 3758 N 1
SFX 3758 0 tüyseniz .

SFX 3759 N 1
SFX 3759 0 ürdüm .

SFX 3760 N 1
SFX 3760 0 ürsem .

SFX 3761 N 1
SFX 3761 0 üyordunuz .

SFX 3762 N 1
SFX 3762 0 üyordur .

SFX 3763 N 1
SFX 3763 0 yordun .

SFX 3764 N 1
SFX 3764 0 yorlardı .

SFX 3765 N 1
SFX 3765 0 yorlarmış .

SFX 3766 N 1
SFX 3766 0 yorlarsa .

SFX 3767 N 1
SFX 3767 0 yormuşum .

SFX 3768 N 1
SFX 3768 0 yorsak .

SFX 3769 N 1
SFX 3769 0 yorsanız .

SFX 3770 N 1
SFX 3770 0 yün .

SFX 3771 N 1
SFX 3771 0 yünüz .

SFX 3772 N 1
SFX 3772 0 ürcesine .

SFX 3773 N 1
SFX 3773 0 mızınki .

SFX 3774 N 1
SFX 3774 0 sınınkilerle .

SFX 3775 N 1
SFX 3775 0 deysen .

SFX 3776 N 1
SFX 3776 0 laraydı .

SFX 3777 N 1
SFX 3777 0 sıydın .

SFX 3778 N 1
SFX 3778 0 sıyımdır .

SFX 3779 N 1
SFX 3779 0 muşlar .

SFX 3780 N 1
SFX 3780 0 uydum .

SFX 3781 N 1
SFX 3781 0 tensin .

SFX 3782 N 1
SFX 3782 0 'lerde .

SFX 3783 N 1
SFX 3783 0 'lerimizi .

SFX 3784 N 1
SFX 3784 0 ındandırlar .

SFX 3785 N 1
SFX 3785 0 deymişiz .

SFX 3786 N 1
SFX 3786 0 lerdeymiş .

SFX 3787 N 1
SFX 3787 0 sindeydiniz .

SFX 3788 N 1
SFX 3788 0 lerimizdekini .

SFX 3789 N 1
SFX 3789 0 lerindekini .

SFX 3790 N 1
SFX 3790 0 tekilerse .

SFX 3791 N 1
SFX 3791 0 uzdur .

SFX 3792 N 1
SFX 3792 0 ınkilerden .

SFX 3793 N 1
SFX 3793 0 ınkiydi .

SFX 3794 N 1
SFX 3794 0 indekilerse .

SFX 3795 N 1
SFX 3795 0 indekiyle .

SFX 3796 N 1
SFX 3796 0 indelerken .

SFX 3797 N 1
SFX 3797 0 indeydin .

SFX 3798 N 1
SFX 3798 0 indeydiniz .

SFX 3799 N 1
SFX 3799 0 lerindekilerde .

SFX 3800 N 1
SFX 3800 0 acaksındır .

SFX 3801 N 1
SFX 3801 0 'ime .

SFX 3802 N 1
SFX 3802 0 yseler .

SFX 3803 N 1
SFX 3803 0 imdiler .

SFX 3804 N 1
SFX 3804 0 larımızdakiyle .

SFX 3805 N 1
SFX 3805 0 larındın .

SFX 3806 N 1
SFX 3806 0 ndekilerde .

SFX 3807 N 1
SFX 3807 0 ndekilere .

SFX 3808 N 1
SFX 3808 0 ndeler .

SFX 3809 N 1
SFX 3809 0 ndendiler .

SFX 3810 N 1
SFX 3810 0 ndenmiş .

SFX 3811 N 1
SFX 3811 0 tendim .

SFX 3812 N 1
SFX 3812 0 tenken .

SFX 3813 N 1
SFX 3813 0 tenseler .

SFX 3814 N 1
SFX 3814 0 muzdaysa .

SFX 3815 N 1
SFX 3815 0 muzsa .

SFX 3816 N 1
SFX 3816 0 dakilerdi .

SFX 3817 N 1
SFX 3817 0 ındanken .

SFX 3818 N 1
SFX 3818 0 suyken .

SFX 3819 N 1
SFX 3819 0 lerindekilerdir .

SFX 3820 N 1
SFX 3820 0 'una .

SFX 3821 N 1
SFX 3821 0 ımdakileri .

SFX 3822 N 1
SFX 3822 0 sındalardır .

SFX 3823 N 1
SFX 3823 0 sıydıysa .

SFX 3824 N 1
SFX 3824 0 sıylaydı .

SFX 3825 N 1
SFX 3825 0 daymışlar .

SFX 3826 N 1
SFX 3826 0 larındaydılar .

SFX 3827 N 1
SFX 3827 0 ımızdayız .

SFX 3828 N 1
SFX 3828 0 ındaysalar .

SFX 3829 N 1
SFX 3829 0 ınkilere .

SFX 3830 N 1
SFX 3830 0 lardakiyle .

SFX 3831 N 1
SFX 3831 0 larımdayken .

SFX 3832 N 1
SFX 3832 0 larınkileri .

SFX 3833 N 1
SFX 3833 0 ınkilerdir .

SFX 3834 N 1
SFX 3834 0 ımlasın .

SFX 3835 N 1
SFX 3835 0 yacağımdır .

SFX 3836 N 1
SFX 3836 0 larladır .

SFX 3837 N 1
SFX 3837 0 ıyorduysak .

SFX 3838 N 1
SFX 3838 0 mışmışsınız .

SFX 3839 N 1
SFX 3839 0 tırlarsa .

SFX 3840 N 1
SFX 3840 0 tıydım .

SFX 3841 N 1
SFX 3841 0 arızdır .

SFX 3842 N 1
SFX 3842 0 ndasın .

SFX 3843 N 1
SFX 3843 0 lasındır .

SFX 3844 N 1
SFX 3844 0 irsinizdir .

SFX 3845 N 1
SFX 3845 0 eceğizdir .

SFX 3846 N 1
SFX 3846 0 yecektiler .

SFX 3847 N 1
SFX 3847 0 lerdendiniz .

SFX 3848 N 1
SFX 3848 0 erdiler .

SFX 3849 N 1
SFX 3849 0 erlermiş .

SFX 3850 N 1
SFX 3850 0 ermişim .

SFX 3851 N 1
SFX 3851 0 erseler .

SFX 3852 N 1
SFX 3852 0 ersem .

SFX 3853 N 1
SFX 3853 0 imdeydik .

SFX 3854 N 1
SFX 3854 0 imdeyiz .

SFX 3855 N 1
SFX 3855 0 imdeyken .

SFX 3856 N 1
SFX 3856 0 imdeymiş .

SFX 3857 N 1
SFX 3857 0 imdeysem .

SFX 3858 N 1
SFX 3858 0 lerindesiniz .

SFX 3859 N 1
SFX 3859 0 lerindeydik .

SFX 3860 N 1
SFX 3860 0 lerindeydiniz .

SFX 3861 N 1
SFX 3861 0 lerindeyiz .

SFX 3862 N 1
SFX 3862 0 incesi .

SFX 3863 N 1
SFX 3863 0 incesidir .

SFX 3864 N 1
SFX 3864 0 incesinde .

SFX 3865 N 1
SFX 3865 0 incesinden .

SFX 3866 N 1
SFX 3866 0 incesine .

SFX 3867 N 1
SFX 3867 0 incesini .

SFX 3868 N 1
SFX 3868 0 incesinin .

SFX 3869 N 1
SFX 3869 0 incesiyle .

SFX 3870 N 1
SFX 3870 0 indik .

SFX 3871 N 1
SFX 3871 0 indim .

SFX 3872 N 1
SFX 3872 0 indiniz .

SFX 3873 N 1
SFX 3873 0 indiyse .

SFX 3874 N 1
SFX 3874 0 ineyim .

SFX 3875 N 1
SFX 3875 0 zliğinin .

SFX 3876 N 1
SFX 3876 0 inmişim .

SFX 3877 N 1
SFX 3877 0 inmişimdir .

SFX 3878 N 1
SFX 3878 0 inmişiz .

SFX 3879 N 1
SFX 3879 0 inmişizdir .

SFX 3880 N 1
SFX 3880 0 inmişse .

SFX 3881 N 1
SFX 3881 0 inmişsin .

SFX 3882 N 1
SFX 3882 0 insek .

SFX 3883 N 1
SFX 3883 0 inseler .

SFX 3884 N 1
SFX 3884 0 inseniz .

SFX 3885 N 1
SFX 3885 0 miştiyse .

SFX 3886 N 1
SFX 3886 0 leydi .

SFX 3887 N 1
SFX 3887 0 'imin .

SFX 3888 N 1
SFX 3888 0 'inkinden .

SFX 3889 N 1
SFX 3889 0 'tir .

SFX 3890 N 1
SFX 3890 0 indeysen .

SFX 3891 N 1
SFX 3891 0 lerimizdekine .

SFX 3892 N 1
SFX 3892 0 'inki .

SFX 3893 N 1
SFX 3893 0 inkilerin .

SFX 3894 N 1
SFX 3894 0 imcesine .

SFX 3895 N 1
SFX 3895 0 dekilerce .

SFX 3896 N 1
SFX 3896 0 dekilerinde .

SFX 3897 N 1
SFX 3897 0 dekilerinin .

SFX 3898 N 1
SFX 3898 0 lerindekilerini .

SFX 3899 N 1
SFX 3899 0 mdekilerce .

SFX 3900 N 1
SFX 3900 0 mdekilerde .

SFX 3901 N 1
SFX 3901 0 mdekilerdir .

SFX 3902 N 1
SFX 3902 0 mdekilerle .

SFX 3903 N 1
SFX 3903 0 mizdekilerce .

SFX 3904 N 1
SFX 3904 0 mizdekilerden .

SFX 3905 N 1
SFX 3905 0 mizdekilere .

SFX 3906 N 1
SFX 3906 0 mizdekileri .

SFX 3907 N 1
SFX 3907 0 mizdekilerle .

SFX 3908 N 1
SFX 3908 0 mizdeyken .

SFX 3909 N 1
SFX 3909 0 nizdekilerde .

SFX 3910 N 1
SFX 3910 0 nizdekilerden .

SFX 3911 N 1
SFX 3911 0 nizdekilere .

SFX 3912 N 1
SFX 3912 0 nizdekileri .

SFX 3913 N 1
SFX 3913 0 nizdense .

SFX 3914 N 1
SFX 3914 0 nizdeyiz .

SFX 3915 N 1
SFX 3915 0 sindekilerde .

SFX 3916 N 1
SFX 3916 0 sindekilerdedir .

SFX 3917 N 1
SFX 3917 0 sindekilerdi .

SFX 3918 N 1
SFX 3918 0 sindekilerini .

SFX 3919 N 1
SFX 3919 0 sindekilerinin .

SFX 3920 N 1
SFX 3920 0 mdense .

SFX 3921 N 1
SFX 3921 0 larlaydı .

SFX 3922 N 1
SFX 3922 0 ardılar .
