dictionaries/tr/index.dic
bütün/9999,2,3,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,44,45,46,47,223,255,319,333,335,339,383,658,768,776,777,778,1118,1119,1120,1621,1622,1652,1653,1654,1665,1668,1676,1680,1681,1682,1687,1689,1691,1808,1811,1815,1816,2277,2515,3457,3708,3717
büyücü/9999,1,2,3,6,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,252,255,256,283,329,333,335,339,363,365,382,421,768,769,770,771,772,773,824,1693,1694,1696,1702,1703,1704,1705,1706,1994,2000,2123,2124,2895,3718,3719
büyüklük/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,254,255,256,283,287,319,329,331,332,333,335,338,339,340,365,373,501,512,513,713,1164,1170,1264,1266,1426,1892,1967,2229,2877,2939,3027,3730
çürü/6,319,343,510,551,608,634,635,639,644,645,646,647,658,718,776,824,1162,1165,1172,1275,1280,1281,1286,1287,1415,1665,1666,1676,2038,2110,2683,3014,3421,3452,3453,3455,3457,3714,3748,3752,3754,3770
düzgü/35,53,323,401,402,769,1489,1699,1870,2554,3007,3321,3502,3716,3745,3746,4389
göçmen/35,36,37,38,39,41,252,253,254,255,256,267,269,273,274,275,276,277,282,283,326,327,329,331,332,333,335,336,338,339,363,365,370,371,373,377,421,539,543,544,546,654,1183,1453,1458,1459,1463,1670,2938,3726
götürü/6,35,37,38,39,54,255,256,283,323,333,335,339,383,402,421,770,771,772,1694,1695,1699,1703,1704,1705,3737
küçük/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,223,252,253,255,256,283,287,319,326,327,328,329,331,332,333,334,335,338,339,363,365,367,368,369,373,374,381,382,383,421,499,500,512,513,658,659,660,719,980,1163,1359,1461,1463,1676,2963,3366,3434,3456,3459,3516,3517,3698,3729,3733
meşgul/3,33,35,39,223,319,326,365,383,658,659,660,719,768,776,777,778,1268,1665,1666,1667,1668,1676,2110,3365,3366,3456,3731
müdavim/35,36,37,38,39,40,41,255,256,263,267,273,274,275,276,277,282,283,327,329,331,333,334,335,336,338,339,369,373,374,377,382,494,495,501,539,540,542,543,544,545,546,548,970,1192,1358,1669,1671,1868,2953,3296,3729,4146,4531
oto/13,14,15,17,19,20,21,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,49,50,53,54,55,59,123,125,128,224,441,459,516,517,524,534,582,662,783,796,1343,1435,1436,1607,1629,1631,1640,2081,2112,2113,2114,2284,2385,2386,2477,2478,2481,3705,4533
ölçül/33,45,119,319,674,679,720,776,824,1676,2038,3189,3421,3422,3423,3424,3425,3428,3430,3436,3437,3452,3455,3505,3506,3513,3515,3708,3772
örgü/9999,2,3,6,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,53,54,252,253,254,255,256,283,323,329,333,335,339,365,366,368,381,386,399,401,402,768,769,770,771,1693,1694,1695,1696,1699,1700,1702,1703,1704,1705,1706,2123,2124,2719,2777,2895,3716
özlü/9999,3,6,8,35,54,333,426,768,769,770,771,1694,1699,1703,1994,3715,6020
söktür/33,45,106,119,319,670,671,679,776,824,1665,1666,1676,2110,2579,3189,3421,3422,3423,3424,3425,3427,3428,3429,3430,3433,3435,3436,3455,3457,3500,3505,3513,3515,3713,3759,3760
sürtün/33,45,119,776,824,1666,1676,3189,3422,3423,3425,3429,3432,3505,3506,3519,3722,3772
süzül/33,45,106,119,319,658,660,679,682,776,824,1665,1666,1676,2110,3189,3421,3422,3423,3424,3425,3426,3427,3428,3429,3430,3431,3432,3435,3436,3455,3501,3505,3506,3508,3511,3513,3514,3515,3520,3712,3759,3772,4286
üre/9999,3,5,6,7,8,35,38,53,54,105,257,259,260,284,314,315,319,323,335,341,343,344,348,359,389,390,395,402,413,414,510,526,551,608,650,651,652,718,1162,1165,1275,1288,1471,2172,3008,3011,3012,3014,3735
ürü/6,510,608,824,1165,1676,3720
üs/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,254,255,256,283,287,319,327,328,329,331,333,334,335,336,338,339,340,365,366,373,374,381,382,420,501,512,513,713,982,1164,1194,1196,1260,1426,1531,1892,2877,2939,2964,2967,3434,3459,3516,3517,3698,3732,3734,3758,5558,5791,6417,6418
Yale/237,244,3782
yüksek/34,35,36,37,38,39,42,43,223,252,253,254,255,256,283,287,288,318,319,326,329,333,335,339,340,341,364,365,421,491,713,718,1164,1170,1174,1197,1237,1264,1266,1426,1861,1967,2379,2719,2877,2878,2966,3732,3786
yükümlü/9999,3,6,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,252,255,256,283,326,331,333,335,339,363,365,377,426,507,508,768,769,770,771,772,773,824,1668,1694,1703,1704,1705,1993,1994,1996,1997,2000,3719,4299,4800,4896
yüzdür/119,671,678,680,721,776,1665,1666,1676,2110,3189,3421,3423,3425,3428,3429,3432,3435,3507,3509,3511,3515,3711,3759
